Maryland, session 2026, SB0622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0622*

SENATE BILL 622
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(13) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs associated
with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the Environment;
[and]
(14) TO PROVIDE LOANS AND GRANTS FOR BUILDING
ELECTRIFICATION AND TRANSPORTATION ELECTRIFICATION; AND
[(14)] (15) to pay the expenses of the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.